Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 10 Retirement System — Contributions and Benefits
36-10-9.2.
Retirement on service allowance — Correctional officers.

This section shall apply to the retirement of members employed as assistant director (adult services), assistant deputy director, chief of inspection, and associate directors, correctional officer, chief of security, work rehabilitation program supervisor, supervisor of custodial records and reports, and classification counselor within the department of corrections.

Any member who has attained the age of fifty (50) years may be retired subsequent to the proper execution and filing of a written application; provided, however, that the member shall have completed twenty (20) years of total service within the department of corrections and who retires before October 1, 2009, or is eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.

For members who become eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, benefits are available to members who have attained the age of fifty-five (55) and have completed at least twenty-five (25) years of total contributory service within the department of corrections. For members in service as of October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, but who are eligible to retire on or prior to June 30, 2012, the minimum retirement age of fifty-five (55) will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of September 30, 2009. The proportional formula shall work as follows:

The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in effect on September 30, 2009, which shall then be subtracted from the minimum retirement age of fifty-five (55).

The formula shall then take the member’s total service credit as of September 30, 2009, as the numerator and the years of service credit determined under (b)(2)(i) as the denominator.

The fraction determined in (b)(2)(ii) shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined in (b)(2)(i) to apply a reduction in years from age fifty-five (55).

Any member with contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, who has completed at least five (5) years of contributory service but who has not completed twenty-five (25) years of contributory service, shall be eligible to retire upon the attainment of the member’s Social Security retirement age or, notwithstanding any other provisions, effective July 1, 2015, members in active service shall be eligible to retire upon the earlier of:

The attainment of at least age sixty-five (65) and the completion of at least thirty (30) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-four (64) and the completion of at least thirty-one (31) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-three (63) and the completion of at least thirty-two (32) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-two (62) and the completion of at least thirty-three (33) years of total service; or

The member’s retirement eligibility date under §

36-10-9(1)(c)(ii)

.

Any member who shall have rendered service both as a state employee under §

36-10-9

, and service under subsection (a) of this section, shall be eligible to elect to combine the member’s service under subsection (a) of this section and service under §

36-10-9

to determine the member’s retirement eligibility date under § 36-10-9. For any member making this election, the member will receive a single benefit equal to the accrued benefit computed under §

36-10-10

.2, plus the accrued benefit computed under §

36-10-10

.

The provisions of subsection (d) shall also apply to members who have retired on a service retirement allowance on or after July 1, 2012. Any such request for adjustment shall be in writing to the retirement board and shall apply prospectively from the date the request is received by the retirement board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 211, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 13, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7; P.L. 2019, ch. 171, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 233, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 21.

36-10-9.3.
Retirement on service allowance — Registered nurses.

This section shall apply to the retirement of members employed as registered nurses within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

Any member who has attained the age of fifty (50) years may be retired subsequent to the proper execution and filing of written application; provided, however, that the member shall have completed twenty-five (25) years of total service within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and who retires before October 1, 2009, or is eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.

For members who become eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, benefits are available to members who have attained the age of fifty-five (55) and have completed at least twenty-five (25) years of total service within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. For members in service as of October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, but who are eligible to retire on or prior to June 30, 2012, the minimum retirement age of fifty-five (55), the retirement age will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of September 30, 2009. The proportional formula shall work as follows:

The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in effect on September 30, 2009, which shall then be subtracted from the minimum retirement age of fifty-five (55).

The formula shall then take the member’s total service credit as of September 30, 2009, as the numerator and the years of service credit determined under (1) as the denominator.

The fraction determined in (2) shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined in (1) to apply a reduction in years from age fifty-five (55).

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 211, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 30; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7.

36-10-9.4.
Post-retirement service as legislator.

Any contrary provisions of the general laws notwithstanding, any retired state employee, teacher, or member of the state police who is a member of the retirement system and who is a member of the general assembly shall continue to be eligible for and receive his or her retirement allowance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 384, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 211, § 2.

36-10-9.5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 211, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 6, effective January 1, 1993.

36-10-9.6.
Aeronautics inspectors — Retirement.

This section shall only apply to the retirement of members employed as aeronautics inspectors.

In determining the creditable service of any aeronautics inspector employed by the state of Rhode Island for the purpose of retirement of a service retirement allowance, not including a deferred retirement allowance, there may be added to, and included in, total service as defined in this chapter, not more than four (4) years of applied work experience, the experience to be defined as a pilot or aeronautics inspector. The service shall not be counted as credible service unless the member shall pay into the retirement system the contribution equal to ten percent (10%) of the member’s first year earnings as an aeronautics inspector for the first year purchased, ten percent (10%) of the member’s second year earnings as an aeronautics inspector for the second year purchased, ten percent (10%) of the member’s third year earnings as an aeronautics inspector for the third year purchased, and ten percent (10%) of the member’s fourth year earnings as an aeronautics inspector for the fourth year purchased. Application to purchase credit and payment for each year of the year for which he or she claims credit shall be made on or before December 31, 1987. Thereafter, a member applying for credits shall pay full actuarial costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7.

36-10-9.7.
Electronic funds transfer.

All members of the employees retirement system retiring under the provisions of titles 42, 8, 36 or 16 of the Rhode Island general laws on or after July 1, 1998, shall be required to participate in electronic funds transfer and to supply the employees retirement system with a bank routing number to effectuate a monthly transfer of benefits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 81, § 1.

36-10-10.
Amount of service retirement allowance.

(i) For employees eligible to retire on or before September 30, 2009, upon retirement for service under §

36-10-9

, a member whose membership commenced before July 1, 2005, and who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, shall receive a retirement allowance which shall be determined in accordance with schedule A below for service prior to July 1, 2012:

Upon retirement for service under §

36-10-9

, a member whose membership commenced after July 1, 2005, or who has not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service as of July 1, 2005, shall, receive a retirement allowance which shall be determined in accordance with Schedule B below for service prior to July 1, 2012:

(ii)

For employees eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire on or before September 30, 2009, upon retirement from service under § 36-10-9, a member whose membership commenced before July 1, 2005, and who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, shall receive a retirement allowance which shall be determined in accordance with schedule A above for service on before September 30, 2009, and shall be determined in accordance with schedule B in subsection (a)(2) below for service on or after October 1, 2009, and prior to July 1, 2012.

The retirement allowance of any member whose membership commenced before July 1, 2005, and who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, shall be in an amount equal to the percentage allowance specified in subsection (a)(1) of his or her average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation multiplied by the number of years of total service, but in no case to exceed eighty percent (80%) of the compensation payable at completion of thirty-five (35) years of service; provided, however, for employees retiring on or after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009 the calculation shall be based on the average highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation. Any member who has in excess of thirty-five (35) years on or before June 2, 1985, shall not be entitled to any refund, and any member with thirty-five (35) years or more on or after June 2, 1985, shall contribute from July 1, 1985, until his or her retirement.

The retirement allowance of any member whose membership commenced after July 1, 2005, or who had not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service as of July 1, 2005, shall, be in an amount equal to the percentage allowance specified in Schedule B of his or her average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation multiplied by the number of years of total service, but in no case to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the compensation payable at the completion of thirty-eight (38) years of service; provided, however, for employees retiring on or after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, the calculation shall be based on the average highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation.

Any member with thirty-eight (38) years or more of service prior to December 31, 1985, shall not be required to make additional contributions. Contributions made between December 31, 1985, and July 1, 1987, by members with thirty-eight (38) or more years of service prior to December 31, 1985, shall be refunded by the retirement board to the persons, their heirs, administrators, or legal representatives.

For service prior to July 1, 2012, the retirement allowance of a member shall be determined in accordance with subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) above. For service on and after July 1, 2012, a member’s retirement allowance shall be equal to:

For members with fewer than twenty (20) years of total service as of June 30, 2012, one percent (1%) of the member’s average compensation multiplied by the member’s years of total service on and after July 1 2012; and

For members with twenty (20) or more years of total service as of June 30, 2012, a member’s retirement allowance shall be equal to one percent (1%) of the member’s average compensation multiplied by the member’s years of total service between July 1, 2012, and June 30, 2015, and two percent (2%) of the member’s average compensation multiplied by the member’s years of total service on and after July 1, 2015. For purposes of computing a member’s total service under the preceding sentence, service purchases shall be included in total service only with respect to those service purchases approved prior to June 30, 2012, and those applications for service purchases received by the retirement system on or before June 30, 2012.

In no event shall a member’s retirement allowance exceed the maximum limitations set forth in paragraph (b) above.

Schedule A Years of Service Percentage Allowance 1st through 10th inclusive 1.7% 11th through 20th inclusive 1.9% 21st through 34th inclusive 3.0% 35th 2.0%

Click to view

Schedule B Years of Service Percentage Allowance 1st through 10th inclusive 1.60% 11th through 20th inclusive 1.80% 21st through 25th inclusive 2.0% 26th through 30th inclusive 2.25% 31st through 37th inclusive 2.50% 38th 2.25%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 12, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 331, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 542, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 605, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 5.

36-10-10.1.
Amount of service retirement allowance — Legislators.

Every person who shall have served as a member of the senate or of the house of representatives as provided in §

36-10-9.1

shall be entitled to receive, upon retirement from service as a member of the general assembly and not otherwise regularly employed by the state of Rhode Island or any of its agencies, commissions, or bureaus an annual sum of six hundred dollars ($600) for each year of total service as determined in §

36-10-9.1

; provided, however, that no person shall receive more than twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) annually, and provided further, however, that the retirement allowance shall be diminished by the amount of any other allowance or payment in the form of wages or salary to which the person shall be entitled from the state of Rhode Island or any of its agencies, commissions, or bureaus pursuant to any other general or special law of the state of Rhode Island, excepting amounts received under the old age and survivors disability insurance program. If any person shall reenter service of the state of Rhode Island or any of its agencies, commissions, or bureaus in any capacity other than as a member of the senate or of the house of representatives and shall render at least two (2) years of service, he or she shall have the option of electing the service retirement allowance provided in this subsection or the service retirement allowance under the other provisions of this chapter. No member of the general assembly, however, shall be permitted to receive the retirement allowance while serving in the general assembly.

Any member of the general assembly who was duly elected at a special election shall be entitled to receive service credit for the full year during which he or she was duly elected and certified, and any legislator serving during the January 1983, session shall be given credit for a full year, provided the legislator pays to the retirement system a lump sum amount equal to the full actuarial value of the credit as certified by the retirement board.

The provisions of this section shall apply regardless of the date of retirement; provided, however, that no senator or representative, except those in service on July 1, 1983, may purchase more than four (4) years of outside time from whatever source.

Any legislator, elected at the general election in 1988, or thereafter, to serve as a member of the general assembly, shall not include other credits for the purposes of this section, except military service as provided in §

36-9-31

; provided however, that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any legislator who was elected to serve as a member of the general assembly prior to the general election of 1988.

If a person is entitled under subsection (a) of this section to an annual retirement allowance which is in excess of the amount permitted by § 415(b)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 415(b)(4), the amount in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000):

Shall be paid until June 30, 1995, notwithstanding the limitation on benefits imposed by §

36-8-20(e)

, relating to § 415 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and

Shall be paid from the retirement system after June 30, 1995, only to the extent permitted by the limitation on benefits imposed by §

36-8-20(e)

.

Any amount not permitted to be paid by the retirement system under subdivision (e)(1)(ii) of this section shall be paid out of general funds, but only to the extent that amounts have been appropriated for those payments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 12, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 87, § 5.

36-10-10.2.
Amount of service retirement allowance — Correctional officers.

Upon retirement for service under §

36-10-9.2

, a member with twenty-five (25) or more years of service as of June 30, 2012, shall receive a retirement allowance of an amount determined under (1) below. All other members shall receive a retirement allowance of an amount equal to the sum of (1) below for service prior to July 1, 2012, plus (2) below for service on and after July 1, 2012.

Two percent (2%) of his or her average compensation multiplied by his or her first thirty (30) years of total service within the department of corrections; any and all years of remaining service shall be issued to the member at a retirement allowance of an amount equal to his or her average compensation multiplied by the percentage allowance determined in accordance with Schedule A below:

On and after July 1, 2012, two percent (2%) of his or her average compensation multiplied by his or her first thirty (30) years of total service within the department of corrections, and three percent (3%) of his or her average compensation multiplied by the member’s thirty-first (31st) through thirty-fifth (35th) years of service.

A member who has rendered service as a state employee under §

36-10-9

shall be eligible to combine the accrued benefit under §

36-10-10

as a state employee with the accrued benefit under this section, provided the member has first obtained eligibility under §

36-10-9

.2(a), (b)(1), or (b)(2). The accrual under §

36-10-10

will be added in the year in which service was rendered consistent with the schedules provided under § 36-10-10.

The provisions of subsection (b) shall also apply to members who have retired on a service retirement allowance on or after July 1, 2012. Any such request for adjustment shall be in writing to the retirement board and will only apply prospectively from the date the request is received by the retirement board.

In no case shall a retirement percentage allowance exceed the greater of the member’s retirement percentage allowance on June 30, 2012, or seventy-five percent (75%). Any member who has in excess of thirty-five (35) years on or before July 1, 1987, shall not be entitled to any refund. Any member with thirty-five (35) years or more on or after July 1, 1987, shall contribute from July 1, 1987, until his or her retirement, provided, however, that any member with thirty-eight (38) years of service prior to July 1, 1987, shall not be required to contribute.

Schedule A Years of Service Percentage Allowance 1 through 30 inclusive 2% 31st 6% 32nd 5% 33rd 4% 34th 3% 35th 2%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 12, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 587, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 6; P.L. 2019, ch. 171, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 233, § 2.

36-10-10.3.
Social security supplemental option.

In lieu of the lifetime service retirement allowance, a vested member who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005 who retires in accordance with §§

16-16-12

,

36-10-9

and

36-10-9

.2 may choose an optional form of retirement benefit known as the social security supplemental option.

This option provides for the payment of a larger benefit before the attainment of age sixty-two (62) and a reduced amount thereafter. The reduced amount shall be equal to the benefit before age sixty-two (62), including cost of living increases, minus the member’s estimated social security benefit payable at age sixty-two (62). Under this option the benefits payable before and after the attainment of age sixty-two (62) will be actuarially determined to be equivalent to the lifetime service retirement allowance as determined in §

36-10-10

.

Election of this supplemental option shall be applicable only to those who elect the service retirement allowance determined in accordance with Schedule A as provided by §

36-10-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 542, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 535, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 7, § 2.

36-10-10.4.
Effect of deferral and/or reduction of salary.

If subsequent to January 1, 1991, a member sustains a loss of salary due to a deferral of salary or a reduction in salary in order to avoid shutdowns, layoffs, or because of a retrenchment of state or local finances, then in calculating the service retirement allowance of the member, the amount of salary deferred and/or the amount of the reduction of salary shall not reduce the amount of annual compensation of the member for the purpose of establishing his or her highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation for members eligible to retire on or before September 30, 2009, or his or her highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation for members who are not eligible to retire on or before September 30, 2009. This provision is subject to subsection (c) of this section.

For purposes of subsection (a), reduction of salary shall mean:

The actual dollar amount which represents the difference between the employee’s salary prior to the voluntary reduction of salary and the employee’s salary after the voluntary reduction of salary; or

The actual dollar amount which represents the difference between the employee’s salary prior to the renegotiation and/or alteration of an existing collective bargaining agreement and the employee’s salary after the renegotiation and/or alteration of an existing collective bargaining agreement.

Reduction of salary also means the voluntary or negotiated reduction in the number of hours that an employee works in a pay period and for which he or she is paid.

An employee who has sustained a reduction in salary in accordance with subsection (a) shall pay, prior to retirement, to the retirement board an amount equal to the difference between the amount of contribution the employee would have paid on his or her salary prior to the reduction in salary and the amount that the employee actually contributed plus interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 139, § 11; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7.

36-10-11.
Service allowance to member withdrawing from service before retirement age.

The right of a service retirement allowance under the provisions of this chapter shall vest in a member who shall withdraw from service prior to his or her attainment of the minimum age of retirement specified in §§

36-10-9

—

36-10-9

.3 who shall not have received a refund, provided the member shall have completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before June 30, 2012, for members terminating service or retiring on or before June 30, 2012, or at least five (5) years of contributory service for members terminating service or retiring on or after July 1, 2012. The member shall become entitled to a service retirement allowance upon his or her attainment of the age established in § 36-10-9 or at his or her option at any date subsequent thereto. The rate of service retirement allowance payable in the case of any member shall be that provided in §

36-10-10

, for the period of total service earned and accrued at the date of withdrawal from service of the member.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-11

; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7.

36-10-12.
Retirement for ordinary disability.

Application for ordinary disability may be made by a member, his or her department head, or a person acting in the member’s behalf, while in active service or on leave of absence for illness, provided that the member has had five (5) or more years of total service of which at least three (3) consecutive years shall have been as an employee of the state or as a teacher as defined in chapter 16 of title 16 and the member is not entitled to a regular service retirement allowance. A statement from a physician shall accompany the application stating that the member is physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of duty and that he or she should be retired.

A medical examination of the member shall be made by three (3) physicians engaged by the retirement board for this purpose, and should the medical examination show that the member is physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of duty and ought to be retired, the physicians shall so report and certify to the retirement board, and the retirement board may retire the member for ordinary disability.

The retirement board shall establish uniform eligibility requirement standards and criteria for ordinary disability which shall apply to all members who make application for retirement for ordinary disability.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-12

; P.L. 1966, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 7.

36-10-13.
Amount of ordinary disability benefit.

Upon retirement for ordinary disability under §

36-10-12

, a member shall receive a benefit equal to the rate prescribed for service retirement under §

36-10-10

, subject to the provisions of §

36-10-31

; provided, however, that no member retiring with less than ten (10) years of total service shall receive a benefit less than he or she would have received if he or she had ten (10) years of total service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-13

; P.L. 1962, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 360, § 1.

36-10-14.
Retirement for accidental disability.

Medical examination of an active member for accidental disability and investigation of all statements and certificates by him or her or in his or her behalf in connection therewith shall be made upon the application of the head of the department in which the member is employed or upon application of the member, or of a person acting in his or her behalf, stating that the member is physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of service as a natural and proximate result of an accident while in the performance of duty, and certify the definite time, place, and conditions of the duty performed by the member resulting in the alleged disability, and that the alleged disability is not the result of willful negligence or misconduct on the part of the member, and is not the result of age or length of service, and that the member should, therefore, be retired.

The application shall be made within five (5) years of the alleged accident from which the injury has resulted in the members present disability and shall be accompanied by an accident report and a physicians report certifying to the disability; provided that if the member was able to return to his or her employment and subsequently reinjures or aggravates the same injury, the application shall be made within the later of five (5) years of the alleged accident or three (3) years of the reinjury or aggravation. The application may also state the member is permanently and totally disabled from any employment.

If a medical examination conducted by three (3) physicians engaged by the retirement board and such investigation as the retirement board may desire to make shall show that the member is physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of service as a natural and proximate result of an accident, while in the performance of duty, and that the disability is not the result of willful negligence or misconduct on the part of the member, and is not the result of age or length of service, and that the member has not attained the age of sixty-five (65), and that the member should be retired, the physicians who conducted the examination shall so certify to the retirement board stating the time, place, and conditions of service performed by the member resulting in the disability and the retirement board may grant the member an accidental disability benefit.

The retirement board shall establish uniform eligibility requirements, standards, and criteria for accidental disability which shall apply to all members who make application for accidental disability benefits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-14

; P.L. 1966, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 499, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 521, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 7; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 3.

36-10-15.
Amount of accidental disability benefit.

For disability applications submitted on or before September 30, 2009, upon retirement for accidental disability under §

36-10-14

, a member shall receive a benefit which shall be equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of his or her annual compensation at the time of his or her retirement, subject to the provisions of §

36-10-31

.

Upon any application for accidental disability submitted on or after October 1, 2009, if the member has been found to be permanently and totally disabled from service but has not been found by the board to be permanently and totally disabled from any employment as a result of his/her accidental disability, a member shall receive a retirement allowance equal to fifty percent (50%) of the rate of the member’s compensation at the date of the member’s retirement, subject to the provisions of §

36-10-31

. The retiree shall, as a condition of continued receipt of a disability retirement allowance, on or before a date fixed by the retirement board, annually under penalties of perjury provide the board with such affidavits and accurate evidence of earnings, employment and gainful activity as the board may require, including, but not limited, joint and/or individual tax returns. Payment of the disability retirement allowance shall continue as long as the individual remains disabled, and regardless of service or age.

Upon retirement for accidental disability that has been found by the board to be permanently and totally disabling from any employment, a member shall receive a retirement allowance equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the rate of the member’s compensation at the date of the member’s retirement subject to the provisions of §

36-10-31

. The retirement board shall apply the terms of subsection

28-33-17(b)

in determining total disability.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-15

; P.L. 1980, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 30.

36-10-16.
Disability benefits pending final decision on application.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of chapters 3 and 4 of this title, and/or any existing regulations of the director of administration or the state retirement board, the state retirement board shall accord to a civil service employee, so entitled under present existing regulations, the minimum retirement benefits pending a decision upon any disability retirement of the civil service employee; provided, however, that the granting of the minimum retirement shall not estop the employee claiming disability from any disability retirement consideration by the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2613, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 2, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-16

.

36-10-17.
Reexamination of disability beneficiaries — Reduction of benefit — Reinstatement to active service.

Once each year the retirement board may, and upon his or her application shall, require any disability beneficiary under the minimum age of service retirement to undergo a medical examination. The examination to be made at the place of residence of the beneficiary or other place mutually agreed upon by a physician or physicians engaged by the retirement board. If the examination indicates that the beneficiary is able to engage in a gainful occupation, his or her name shall be placed on such appropriate lists of candidates as are prepared for appointment to positions in his or her department or agency for which he or she is stated to be qualified and for a salary grade not exceeding that from which he or she was last retired. Should the beneficiary be engaged in a gainful occupation or should he or she be offered service as a result of the placing of his or her name on a list of candidates, the retirement board shall adjust and from time to time readjust, the amount of his or her disability benefit to an amount which shall not exceed the rate of benefit upon which he or she was originally retired, and which, when added to the amount then earnable by him or her, shall not exceed his or her rate of annual compensation currently for the classification that the disability annuitant held prior to retirement. Should any disability beneficiary under the minimum age of service retirement refuse to submit to one medical examination in any year by a physician or physicians designated by the retirement board, his or her benefit shall be discontinued until his or her withdrawal of the refusal and should his or her refusal continue for one year, all his or her rights in and to disability benefit shall be revoked by the retirement board. A disability beneficiary, reinstated to active service, shall be reinstated as a member and participate in the rights of the retirement system to the same extent as any other member.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-17

; P.L. 1989, ch. 403, § 2.

36-10-18.
Optional benefits.

A beneficiary, or, if the beneficiary be an incompetent, then the beneficiary’s spouse or domestic partner or if there is no spouse or domestic partner, a guardian of the beneficiary’s estate, may elect to receive the benefit in a retirement allowance, payable throughout life, or the beneficiary may then elect to receive the actuarial equivalent, at that time, of the beneficiary’s retirement allowance in a lesser retirement allowance as determined by actuarial calculation, which shall be payable throughout life with the provision that:

Option 1. Upon the beneficiary’s death, the beneficiary’s lesser retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to such person having an insurable interest in the beneficiary’s life, as the beneficiary, the beneficiary’s spouse or domestic partner, or the beneficiary’s guardian so electing, shall nominate by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the retirement board at the time of his or her retirement.

Option 2. Upon the beneficiary’s death, one-half (1/2) of the beneficiary’s lesser retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to such person, having an insurable interest in the beneficiary’s life, as the beneficiary, the beneficiary’s spouse or domestic partner, or the beneficiary’s guardian so electing, shall nominate by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the retirement board at the time of the beneficiary’s retirement.

For purposes of any election under this section or §

36-10-19.1

, the member, member’s spouse or domestic partner, or guardian, as the case may be, may designate more than one person to receive benefits after the member’s death, provided that the designation shall specify the portion of the actuarial equivalent of the member’s retirement allowance to be paid to each person, and provided further that the aggregate actuarial value of the portions shall not exceed the actuarial equivalent of the member’s retirement benefit determined:

In the case of an election under this section) as of the date of the member’s retirement; or

In the case of an election under §

36-10-19.1

as of the member’s date of death.

A member selecting more than one person to receive benefits under this section or § 36-10-19.1 may only select beneficiaries from among his or her children, adopted children, step-children, and/or spouse or domestic partner.

If prior to July 1, 2012, a member elected an optional form of benefit other than a life annuity in accordance with paragraph (a)(1) or (2) above, the member may elect to change his or her form of benefit to a life annuity by filing an election with the retirement board on or before June 30, 2013, provided that the member’s beneficiary is still alive at the time the election is filed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, §§ 9, 10; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-18

; P.L. 1973, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 11; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7.